Utah statutes.
10-9a-102.   Purposes -- General land use authority.
(1)  The purposes of this chapter are to provide for the health, safety, and
welfare, and promote the prosperity, improve the morals, peace and good order,
comfort, convenience, and aesthetics of each municipality and its present and
future inhabitants and businesses, to protect the tax base, to secure economy
in governmental expenditures, to foster the state's agricultural and other
industries, to protect both urban and nonurban development, to protect and
ensure access to sunlight for solar energy devices, to provide fundamental
fairness in land use regulation, and to protect property values.
(2)  To accomplish the purposes of this chapter, municipalities may enact all
ordinances, resolutions, and rules and may enter into other forms of land use
controls and development agreements that they consider necessary or
appropriate for the use and development of land within the municipality,
including ordinances, resolutions, rules, restrictive covenants, easements,
and development agreements governing uses, density, open spaces, structures,
buildings, energy efficiency, light and air, air quality, transportation and
public or alternative transportation, infrastructure, street and building
orientation and width requirements, public facilities, fundamental fairness in
land use regulation, considerations of surrounding land uses and the balance
of the foregoing purposes with a landowner's private property interests,
height and location of vegetation, trees, and landscaping, unless expressly
prohibited by law.
